Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 23. Pharmaceutical Product Development and Utilization

§ 57-23-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Pharmaceutical Product Development and Utilization Law of 1964.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-31; Laws, 1964, ch. 438, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).

§ 57-23-3.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

That the economic progress of Mississippi depends in large measure upon the development and wise use of the natural resources of the state;

That the animal, vegetable and mineral resources in the state offer a tremendous potential for development for the industrial pharmaceutical markets;

That these resources when properly oriented and researched and developed can contribute substantially to the total economic development of Mississippi;

That there is a tremendous need for additional knowledge of natural drug products, the uses for which such products may be employed in the pharmaceutical industry for the benefit of public health, and the means of converting them to such uses; and

That this chapter is specifically designed to establish a program for the discovery and dissemination of knowledge concerning natural drug products in the state and discovering product improvements, outlining processing and manufacturing opportunities and conducting research on distribution and sales potential.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-32; Laws, 1964, ch. 438, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).

§ 57-23-5.
Establishment of research institute.

The board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning is hereby authorized and directed to establish a research institute of pharmaceutical sciences at the University of Mississippi under the direction of the chancellor and such other administrative authorities within the university as said board of trustees may determine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-33; Laws, 1964, ch. 438, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).

§ 57-23-7.
Provision of equipment, personnel, etc., for institute.

The board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning shall provide for such equipment, personnel, supplies and services as it shall determine to be necessary for the proper operation and maintenance of said institute, having due regard for the contributory facilities and programs already existing at the University of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-34; Laws, 1964, ch. 438, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).

§ 57-23-9.
Functions of institute.

It shall be the function of the institute to conduct a program of research in the properties and uses of natural drug products and the methods of developing these products to useful purposes in the pharmaceutical industry, and to disseminate its findings to the public and to all individuals and agencies for whom such knowledge will be helpful. Data from basic research studies shall be released to applied research agencies for completion of the applied studies. Efforts shall be made to coordinate basic and applied work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-35; Laws, 1964, ch. 438, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).

§ 57-23-11.
Acceptance of contributions, donations, gifts and grants by institute.

In addition to appropriations made by the Mississippi Legislature for the operation and support of the institute, the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning is authorized and empowered to receive contributions, donations, gifts, and grants of money and/or property, equipment, materials or manpower from persons, foundations, trust funds, corporations, organizations, and other sources, to be expended by said board in carrying out the objectives of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-36; Laws, 1964, ch. 438, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).

§ 57-23-13.
Cooperation by institute with other state agencies.

The institute personnel shall cooperate fully with the various departments of the state government, with the colleges and universities of the state, with the University Research Center, the Mississippi Department of Economic Development, and other research and development agencies in an effort to fully effectuate the purposes of this chapter. All state agencies and departments are hereby authorized and directed to give the institute and its personnel their full cooperation in every possible manner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-37; Laws, 1964, ch. 438, § 7; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-23-15.
Conduct of research on contractual basis for industries, governmental agencies, etc.

The institute personnel may at their discretion, and subject to approval of the proper administrative authorities at the University of Mississippi, do research on a contract on project basis for industries, governmental agencies, public or private organizations or corporations, or any others, at a price and on a basis to be determined by the aforesaid personnel. The proceeds derived from such research project shall be used, in addition to other funds provided therefor, for the operation and support of the institute.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-38; Laws, 1964, ch. 438, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).